Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.240

Application of chapter to fire protection districts.

Any fire protection district having a full paid fire department may by resolution of its board of fire commissioners provide for the participation of its full time employees in a pension program in the same manner, with the same powers, and with the same force and effect as to such districts as the pension program provided by chapter 41.16 RCW for cities, towns and municipalities, or fire protection districts.

[ 1955 c 46 s 1.]